test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tyrvy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - тӹрвӹ: # Noun 'lip / huulet'
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Nom: тӹрвӹ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Gen: тӹрвӹн
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Acc: тӹрвӹм
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Com: тӹрвӹге
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Dat: тӹрвӹлӓн
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Ine: тӹрвӹштӹ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Ill: тӹрвӹшкӹ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Lat: тӹрвеш
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Comp: тӹрвӹлӓ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Abe: тӹрвӹде
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Nom: тӹрвӹвлӓ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Gen: тӹрвӹвлӓн
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Acc: тӹрвӹвлӓм
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Com: тӹрвӹвлӓге
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Dat: тӹрвӹвлӓлӓн
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Ine: тӹрвӹвлӓштӹ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Ill: [тӹрвӹвлӓшкӹ, тӹрвӹвлӓш]
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Lat: тӹрвӹвлӓэш
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Comp: тӹрвӹвлӓлӓ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Abe: тӹрвӹвлӓде

     тӹрвӹ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Nom: тӹрвем 
     тӹрвӹ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Gen: тӹрвемӹн
     тӹрвӹ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Acc: тӹрвемӹм
     тӹрвӹ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Com: тӹрвемге
     тӹрвӹ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Dat: тӹрвемлӓн
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: тӹрвӹштем
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: тӹрвӹшкем
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg1: тӹрвешем
     тӹрвӹ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Comp: тӹрвемлӓ 
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Comp+PxSg1: тӹрвӹлӓэм 
     тӹрвӹ+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: тӹрвӹдеэм 
     тӹрвӹ+N+PxSg1+Sg+Abe: тӹрвемде
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: тӹрвӹвлӓэм
     тӹрвӹ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Nom: тӹрвемвлӓ
     тӹрвӹ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Gen: тӹрвемвлӓн
     тӹрвӹ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Acc: тӹрвемвлӓм
     тӹрвӹ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Com: тӹрвемвлӓге
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+PxSg1+Com: тӹрвӹвлӓэмге
     тӹрвӹ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Dat: тӹрвемвлӓлӓн
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: тӹрвӹвлӓэмлӓн
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: тӹрвӹвлӓлӓнем
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: тӹрвӹвлӓштем
     тӹрвӹ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Ine: тӹрвемвлӓштӹ
     тӹрвӹ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Ill: тӹрвемвлӓшкӹ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: тӹрвӹвлӓшкем
     тӹрвӹ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Lat: тӹрвемвлӓэш
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg1: тӹрвӹвлӓэшем
     тӹрвӹ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Comp: тӹрвемвлӓлӓ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+Comp+PxSg1: тӹрвӹвлӓлӓэм
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+PxSg1+Comp: тӹрвӹвлӓэмлӓ
     тӹрвӹ+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abe: тӹрвӹвлӓэмде
     тӹрвӹ+N+PxSg1+Pl+Abe: тӹрвемвлӓде
#тӹрвет, тӹрветшӹ, 
#тӹрвӹжӹ, 
